Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.170

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 35.22.660, 35.63.180, 35A.63.210, 36.32.520, and 36.70.675:

(1) "Family day care home" means a person regularly providing care during part of the twenty-four-hour day to six or fewer children in the family abode of the person or persons under whose direct care the children are placed.

(2) "Mini-day care center" means a person or agency providing care during part of the twenty-four-hour day to twelve or fewer children in a facility other than the family abode of the person or persons under whose direct care the children are placed, or for the care of seven through twelve children in the family abode of such person or persons.

(3) "Day care center" means a person or agency that provides care for thirteen or more children during part of the twenty-four-hour day.

(4) "Child care facility" means a family day care home, mini-day care center, and day care center.

[ 1989 c 335 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—1989 c 335: "The legislature finds that:

(1) A majority of women with preschool and school-age children in Washington state are working outside of the home and are in need of child care services for their children;

(2) The supply of licensed child care facilities in Washington state is insufficient to meet the growing demand for child care services;

(3) The most convenient location of child care facilities for many working families is near the family's home or workplace." [ 1989 c 335 s 1.]

Purpose—1989 c 335: "The purpose of this act is to encourage the dispersion of child care facilities throughout cities and counties in Washington state so that child care services are available at convenient locations to working parents." [ 1989 c 335 s 2.]

Severability—1989 c 335: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1989 c 335 s 10.]